Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6611
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Economic Development and Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 77.